Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
SECRETARY OF STATE

7-101-301 and 7-101-302. (Repealed)

Editor's note:

(1) This article was added in 1993. This part 3 was subsequently repealed in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, and was not amended prior to its repeal. For the text of this part 3 prior to 2004, consult the 2003 Colorado Revised Statutes.

(2) Section 7-101-302 provided for the repeal of this part 3, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)